Nebraska, session 109, LB365A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $9,634 from the General Fund
and $15,476 from federal funds for FY2026-27 and (2) $19,268 from the General
Fund and $30,952 from federal funds for FY2027-28 to the Department of Health
and Human Services, for Program 348, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 365, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$9,634 General Funds and $15,476 federal funds for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2027-28 $19,268 General Funds and $30,952 federal funds for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-